Indiana, session 2026, SB252.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 1-1-2-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 5. A person who commits a criminal offense commits a
separate offense for each victim listed in a separately charged
offense. A court may enter a conviction and impose a sentence for
each charged offense.
SECTION 2. IC 11-10-1-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The department shall transport sentenced
offenders from the Marion County adult detention facility to the
appropriate correctional facility at least one (1) time per week.
(b) This section applies specifically to the Marion County adult
detention facility because that facility holds hundreds of offenders
sentenced to custody in the department and awaiting
transportation.
SECTION 3. IC 31-30-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Except for those cases in which the juvenile
court has no jurisdiction in accordance with IC 31-30-1-4, the court
shall, upon motion of the prosecuting attorney and after full
investigation and hearing, waive jurisdiction if it finds that:
(1) the child is charged with an act that, if committed by an adult,
would be:
(A) a Level 1 felony, Level 2 felony, Level 3 felony, or Level
4 felony, except a felony defined by IC 35-48-4;
(B) involuntary manslaughter as a Level 5 felony under
IC 35-42-1-4;
(C) reckless homicide as a Level 5 felony under IC 35-42-1-5;
or
(D) unlawful carrying of a handgun as a felony under
IC 35-47-2-1.5;
(2) there is probable cause to believe that the child has committed
the act; and
(3) the child was at least sixteen (16) years of age when the act
charged was allegedly committed;
unless it would be in the best interests of the child and of the safety and
welfare of the community for the child to remain within the juvenile
justice system.
SECTION 4. IC 33-34-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 301, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The following fees and costs
apply to cases in the small claims court:
(1) A township docket fee of five dollars ($5) plus forty-five
percent (45%) of the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
under IC 33-37-4-2.
(2) The bailiff's service of process by registered or certified mail
fee of fifteen dollars ($15) for each service.
(3) The cost for the personal service of process by the bailiff or
other process server of fifteen dollars ($15) for each service.
(4) Witness fees, if any, in the amount provided by IC 33-37-10-3
to be taxed and charged in the circuit court.
(5) A redocketing fee, if any, of five dollars ($5).
(6) A document storage fee under IC 33-37-5-20.
(7) An automated record keeping fee under IC 33-37-5-21.
(8) A late fee, if any, under IC 33-37-5-22.
(9) A public defense administration fee under IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(10) A judicial insurance adjustment fee under IC 33-37-5-25.
(11) A judicial salaries fee under IC 33-37-5-26.
(12) A court administration fee under IC 33-37-5-27.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(13) A pro bono legal services fee under IC 33-37-5-31.
(14) A sheriff's service of process fee under IC 33-37-5-15 for
each service of process performed outside Marion County.
(15) A small claims service fee of twenty-six dollars ($26) under
IC 33-37-5-35.
(16) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee under
IC 33-37-5-37.
The township docket fee and the cost for the initial service of process
shall be paid at the institution of a case. The cost of service after the
initial service shall be assessed and paid after service has been made.
The cost of witness fees shall be paid before the witnesses are called.
(b) If the amount of the township docket fee computed under
subsection (a)(1) is not equal to a whole number, the amount shall be
rounded to the next highest whole number.
SECTION 5. IC 33-34-8-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.213-2025,
SECTION 302, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Payment for all costs made as
a result of proceedings in a small claims court shall be to the _______
Township of Marion County Small Claims Court (with the name of the
township inserted). The court shall issue a receipt for all money
received on a form numbered serially in duplicate.
(b) The court shall distribute collected fees according the following:
(1) Distribute semiannually to the state comptroller:
(A) all automated record keeping fees (IC 33-37-5-21)
received by the court for deposit in the homeowner protection
unit account established by IC 4-6-12-9 and the state user fee
fund established under IC 33-37-9;
(B) all public defense administration fees collected by the
court under IC 33-37-5-21.2 for deposit in the state general
fund;
(C) sixty percent (60%) of all court administration fees
collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-27 for deposit in the
state general fund;
(D) all judicial insurance adjustment fees collected by the
court under IC 33-37-5-25 for deposit in the state general fund;
(E) seventy-five percent (75%) of all judicial salaries fees
collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-26 for deposit in the
state general fund; and
(F) one hundred percent (100%) of the pro bono legal services
fees collected by the court under IC 33-37-5-31 for deposit in
the pro bono legal services fund established by IC 33-37-5-34;
and
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(G) all prosecuting attorney compensation fees collected by
the court under IC 33-37-5-37 for deposit in the state
general fund.
(2) Distribute monthly to the county auditor all document storage
fees received by the court. The county auditor shall deposit the
document storage fees received under this subdivision into the
clerk's record perpetuation fund under IC 33-37-5-2.
(3) Distribute the following fees monthly to the county auditor for
deposit in the small claims fund established under IC 33-37-5-36:
(A) The remaining twenty-five percent (25%) of the judicial
salaries fees described in subdivision (1)(E).
(B) Township docket fees and late fees.
(C) Small claims service fee received under IC 33-37-5-35.
(D) The remaining forty percent (40%) of the court
administration fees described under subdivision (1)(C).
SECTION 6. IC 33-37-4-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2023,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) For each action that results in a felony
conviction under IC 35-50-2 or a misdemeanor conviction under
IC 35-50-3, the clerk shall collect from the defendant a criminal costs
fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120).
(b) In addition to the criminal costs fee collected under this section,
the clerk shall collect from the defendant the following fees if they are
required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(3) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(4) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(5) A drug abuse, prosecution, interdiction, and correction fee
(IC 33-37-5-9).
(6) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(7) A child abuse prevention fee (IC 33-37-5-12).
(8) A domestic violence prevention and treatment fee
(IC 33-37-5-13).
(9) A highway worksite fee (IC 33-37-5-14).
(10) A deferred prosecution fee (IC 33-37-5-17).
(11) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(12) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(13) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(14) A sexual assault victims assistance fee (IC 33-37-5-23).
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(15) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(16) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(17) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(18) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(19) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
(20) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) Instead of the criminal costs fee prescribed by this section,
except for the automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21), the clerk
shall collect a pretrial diversion program fee if an agreement between
the prosecuting attorney and the accused person entered into under
IC 33-39-1-8 requires payment of those fees by the accused person.
The pretrial diversion program fee is:
(1) an initial user's fee of fifty dollars ($50) for a misdemeanor
offense;
(2) an initial user's fee of seventy-five dollars ($75) for a felony
offense;
(3) a monthly user's fee of twenty dollars ($20) for each month
that the person remains in the pretrial diversion program; and
(4) any additional program fee or cost that is:
(A) reasonably related to the person's rehabilitation; and
(B) approved by the court.
A monthly user fee may not be collected beyond the maximum length
of the possible sentence.
(d) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or city or town
fiscal officer the following fees, not later than thirty (30) days after the
fees are collected:
(1) The pretrial diversion fee.
(2) The marijuana eradication program fee.
(3) The alcohol and drug services program fee.
(4) The law enforcement continuing education program fee.
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit fees transferred under this
subsection in the appropriate user fee fund established under
IC 33-37-8.
(e) Unless otherwise directed by a court, if a clerk collects only part
of a criminal costs fee from a defendant under this section, the clerk
shall distribute the partial payment of the criminal costs fee as follows:
(1) The clerk shall apply the partial payment to general court
costs.
(2) If there is money remaining after the partial payment is
applied to general court costs under subdivision (1), the clerk
shall distribute the remainder of the partial payment for deposit in
the appropriate county user fee fund.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(3) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (2), the clerk shall distribute the remainder of the
partial payment for deposit in the state user fee fund.
(4) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (3), the clerk shall distribute the remainder of the
partial payment to any other applicable user fee fund.
(5) If there is money remaining after distribution under
subdivision (4), the clerk shall apply the remainder of the partial
payment to any outstanding fines owed by the defendant.
SECTION 7. IC 33-37-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.120-2023,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Except as provided in subsections (d) and
(e), for each action that results in a judgment:
(1) for a violation constituting an infraction; or
(2) for a violation of an ordinance of a municipal corporation (as
defined in IC 36-1-2-10);
the clerk shall collect from the defendant an infraction or ordinance
violation costs fee of seventy dollars ($70).
(b) In addition to the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
collected under this section, the clerk shall collect from the defendant
the following fees, if they are required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(3) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(4) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(5) A highway worksite fee (IC 33-37-5-14).
(6) A deferred prosecution fee (IC 33-37-5-17).
(7) A jury fee (IC 33-37-5-19).
(8) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(9) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(10) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(11) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(12) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(13) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(14) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(15) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
(16) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or fiscal officer of
the municipal corporation the following fees, not later than thirty (30)
days after the fees are collected:
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(1) The alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(2) The law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(3) The deferral program fee (subsection (e)).
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit the fees in the user fee fund
established under IC 33-37-8.
(d) The defendant is not liable for any ordinance violation costs fee
in an action if all the following apply:
(1) The defendant was charged with an ordinance violation
subject to IC 33-36.
(2) The defendant denied the violation under IC 33-36-3.
(3) Proceedings in court against the defendant were initiated
under IC 34-28-5 (or IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(4) The defendant was tried and the court entered judgment for
the defendant for the violation.
(e) Instead of the infraction or ordinance violation costs fee
prescribed by subsection (a), except for the automated record keeping
fee (IC 33-37-5-21), the clerk shall collect a deferral program fee if an
agreement between a prosecuting attorney or an attorney for a
municipal corporation and the person charged with a violation entered
into under IC 34-28-5-1 (or IC 34-4-32-1 before its repeal) requires
payment of those fees by the person charged with the violation. The
deferral program fee is:
(1) an initial user's fee not to exceed fifty-two dollars ($52); and
(2) a monthly user's fee not to exceed ten dollars ($10) for each
month the person remains in the deferral program.
(f) The fees prescribed by this section are costs for purposes of
IC 34-28-5-5 and may be collected from a defendant against whom
judgment is entered. Any penalty assessed is in addition to costs.
SECTION 8. IC 33-37-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.85-2017,
SECTION 110, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The clerk shall collect a
juvenile costs fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each action
filed under any of the following:
(1) IC 31-34 (children in need of services).
(2) IC 31-37 (delinquent children).
(3) IC 31-14 (paternity).
(b) In addition to the juvenile costs fee collected under this section,
the clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(2) A marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(3) An alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(4) A law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
(5) An alcohol and drug countermeasures fee (IC 33-37-5-10).
(6) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(7) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(8) A late payment fee (IC 33-37-5-22).
(9) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(10) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(11) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(12) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(13) A DNA sample processing fee (IC 33-37-5-26.2).
(14) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) The clerk shall transfer to the county auditor or city or town
fiscal officer the following fees not later than thirty (30) days after they
are collected:
(1) The marijuana eradication program fee (IC 33-37-5-7).
(2) The alcohol and drug services program fee (IC 33-37-5-8(b)).
(3) The law enforcement continuing education program fee
(IC 33-37-5-8(c)).
The auditor or fiscal officer shall deposit the fees in the appropriate
user fee fund established under IC 33-37-8.
SECTION 9. IC 33-37-4-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The clerk shall collect a civil costs fee of
one hundred dollars ($100) from a party filing a civil action. This
subsection does not apply to the following civil actions:
(1) Proceedings to enforce a statute defining an infraction under
IC 34-28-5 (or IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(2) Proceedings to enforce an ordinance under IC 34-28-5 (or
IC 34-4-32 before its repeal).
(3) Proceedings in juvenile court under IC 31-34 or IC 31-37.
(4) Proceedings in paternity under IC 31-14.
(5) Proceedings in small claims court under IC 33-34.
(6) Proceedings in actions described in section 7 of this chapter.
(b) In addition to the civil costs fee collected under this section, the
clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A support and maintenance fee (IC 33-37-5-6).
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(3) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(4) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(5) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(6) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(7) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(8) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(9) A service fee (IC 33-37-5-28(b)(1) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(2)).
(10) A garnishee service fee (IC 33-37-5-28(b)(3) or
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(4)).
(11) For a mortgage foreclosure action, a mortgage foreclosure
counseling and education fee (IC 33-37-5-33) (before its
expiration on July 1, 2017).
(12) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(13) A jury fee (IC 33-37-5-19.5).
(14) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
SECTION 10. IC 33-37-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) For each small claims action, the clerk shall
collect the following fees:
(1) From the party filing the action:
(A) a small claims costs fee of thirty-five dollars ($35);
(B) a small claims service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
named defendant that is not a garnishee defendant; and
(C) if the party has named more than three (3) garnishees or
garnishee defendants, a small claims garnishee service fee of
ten dollars ($10) for each garnishee or garnishee defendant in
excess of three (3).
(2) From any party adding a defendant that is not a garnishee
defendant, a small claims service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
defendant that is not a garnishee defendant added in the action.
(3) From any party adding a garnishee or garnishee defendant, a
small claims garnishee service fee of ten dollars ($10) for each
garnishee or garnishee defendant added to the action. However,
a clerk may not collect a small claims garnishee service fee for the
first three (3) garnishees named in the action.
However, a clerk may not collect a small claims costs fee, small claims
service fee, or small claims garnishee service fee for a small claims
action filed by or on behalf of the attorney general.
(b) A clerk may not collect a fee under subsection (a)(1)(B),
(a)(1)(C), (a)(2), or (a)(3) for a small claims action filed through the
Indiana electronic filing system adopted by the Indiana supreme court.
(c) In addition to a small claims costs fee, small claims service fee,
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


and small claims garnishee service fee collected under this section, the
clerk shall collect the following fees, if they are required under
IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(3) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(4) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(5) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(6) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(7) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(8) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(9) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
SECTION 11. IC 33-37-4-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided under subsection (c), the
clerk shall collect from the party filing the action a probate costs fee of
one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each action filed under any of
the following:
(1) IC 29 (probate).
(2) IC 30 (trusts and fiduciaries).
(b) In addition to the probate costs fee collected under subsection
(a), the clerk shall collect from the party filing the action the following
fees, if they are required under IC 33-37-5:
(1) A document fee (IC 33-37-5-1, IC 33-37-5-3, or
IC 33-37-5-4).
(2) A document storage fee (IC 33-37-5-20).
(3) An automated record keeping fee (IC 33-37-5-21).
(4) A public defense administration fee (IC 33-37-5-21.2).
(5) A judicial insurance adjustment fee (IC 33-37-5-25).
(6) A judicial salaries fee (IC 33-37-5-26).
(7) A court administration fee (IC 33-37-5-27).
(8) A pro bono legal services fee (IC 33-37-5-31).
(9) A prosecuting attorney compensation fee (IC 33-37-5-37).
(c) A clerk may not collect a court costs fee for the filing of the
following exempted actions:
(1) Petition to open a safety deposit box.
(2) Filing an inheritance tax return, unless proceedings other than
the court's approval of the return become necessary.
(3) Offering a will for probate under IC 29-1-7, unless
proceedings other than admitting the will to probate become
necessary.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(4) Filing a closing statement for an estate described in
IC 29-1-8-4.
SECTION 12. IC 33-37-5-37 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 37. (a) This section does not apply
to a proceeding involving a child alleged to be a delinquent child.
(b) This subsection does not apply to the following:
(1) A criminal proceeding.
(2) A proceeding to enforce a statute defining an infraction.
(3) A proceeding for an ordinance violation.
In each action filed in a court described in IC 33-37-1-1 and in each
small claims action in a court described in IC 33-34, the clerk shall
collect a prosecuting attorney compensation fee of forty dollars
($40).
(c) In each action in which a person is:
(1) convicted of an offense;
(2) required to pay a pretrial diversion fee;
(3) found to have committed an infraction; or
(4) found to have violated an ordinance;
the clerk shall collect a prosecuting attorney compensation fee of
forty dollars ($40).
SECTION 13. IC 33-37-7-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute
semiannually to the state comptroller as the state share for deposit in
the homeowner protection unit account established by IC 4-6-12-9 one
hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping fees collected
under IC 33-37-5-21 with respect to actions resulting in the accused
person entering into a pretrial diversion program agreement under
IC 33-39-1-8 or a deferral program agreement under IC 34-28-5-1 and
for deposit in the state general fund seventy percent (70%) of the
amount of fees collected under the following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-3(a) (juvenile costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(6) IC 33-37-4-7(a) (probate costs fees).
(7) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(b) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the state user fee fund established in
IC 33-37-9-2 the following:
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
(3) One hundred percent (100%) of the child abuse prevention
fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(7).
(4) One hundred percent (100%) of the domestic violence
prevention and treatment fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(8).
(5) One hundred percent (100%) of the highway worksite fees
collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(9) and IC 33-37-4-2(b)(5).
(6) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18.
(7) One hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping
fee collected under IC 33-37-5-21 not distributed under
subsection (a).
(c) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed by a clerk under this
subsection into the county drug free community fund established under
IC 5-2-11.
(d) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor one hundred percent (100%) of the late payment fees collected
under IC 33-37-5-22. The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed
by a clerk under this subsection as follows:
(1) If directed to do so by an ordinance adopted by the county
fiscal body, the county auditor shall deposit forty percent (40%)
of the fees in the clerk's record perpetuation fund established
under IC 33-37-5-2 and sixty percent (60%) of the fees in the
county general fund.
(2) If the county fiscal body has not adopted an ordinance
described in subdivision (1), the county auditor shall deposit all
the fees in the county general fund.
(e) The clerk of the circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the sexual assault victims assistance
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


fund established by IC 5-2-6-23(d) one hundred percent (100%) of the
sexual assault victims assistance fees collected under IC 33-37-5-23.
(f) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) of the support and maintenance
fees for cases designated as non-Title IV-D child support cases in
the Indiana support enforcement tracking system (ISETS) or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system
collected under IC 33-37-5-6.
(2) The percentage share of the support and maintenance fees for
cases designated as Title IV-D child support cases in ISETS or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system
collected under IC 33-37-5-6 that is reimbursable to the county at
the federal financial participation rate.
The county clerk shall distribute monthly to the department of child
services the percentage share of the support and maintenance fees for
cases designated as Title IV-D child support cases in ISETS, or the
successor statewide automated support enforcement system, collected
under IC 33-37-5-6 that is not reimbursable to the county at the
applicable federal financial participation rate.
(g) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute monthly to the county
auditor the following:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) of the small claims service fee
under IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(B) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(2) for deposit in
the county general fund.
(2) One hundred percent (100%) of the small claims garnishee
service fee under IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(C) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(3) for
deposit in the county general fund.
(3) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18 for deposit in the county general fund.
(h) This subsection does not apply to court administration fees
collected in small claims actions filed in a court described in IC 33-34.
The clerk of a circuit court shall semiannually distribute to the state
comptroller for deposit in the state general fund one hundred percent
(100%) of the following:
(1) The public defense administration fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(2) The judicial salaries fees collected under IC 33-37-5-26.
(3) The DNA sample processing fees collected under
IC 33-37-5-26.2.
(4) The court administration fees collected under IC 33-37-5-27.
(5) The judicial insurance adjustment fee collected under
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


IC 33-37-5-25.
(6) The prosecuting attorney compensation fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-37.
(i) The proceeds of the service fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(1) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(2) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
service fees collected in a circuit, superior, county, or probate
court to the county auditor for deposit in the county general fund.
(2) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
service fees collected in a city or town court to the city or town
fiscal officer for deposit in the city or town general fund.
(j) The proceeds of the garnishee service fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-28(b)(3) or IC 33-37-5-28(b)(4) shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
garnishee service fees collected in a circuit, superior, county, or
probate court to the county auditor for deposit in the county
general fund.
(2) The clerk shall distribute one hundred percent (100%) of the
garnishee service fees collected in a city or town court to the city
or town fiscal officer for deposit in the city or town general fund.
(k) The clerk of the circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the home ownership education account
established by IC 5-20-1-27 one hundred percent (100%) of the
following:
(1) The mortgage foreclosure counseling and education fees
collected under IC 33-37-5-33 (before its expiration on July 1,
2017).
(2) Any civil penalties imposed and collected by a court for a
violation of a court order in a foreclosure action under
IC 32-30-10.5.
(l) The clerk of a circuit court shall distribute semiannually to the
state comptroller for deposit in the pro bono legal services fund
established by IC 33-37-5-34 one hundred percent (100%) of the pro
bono legal services fees collected under IC 33-37-5-31.
SECTION 14. IC 33-37-7-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.106-2025,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The clerk of a city or town court shall
distribute semiannually to the state comptroller as the state share for
deposit in the homeowner protection unit account established by
IC 4-6-12-9 one hundred percent (100%) of the automated record
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


keeping fees collected under IC 33-37-5-21 with respect to actions
resulting in the accused person entering into a pretrial diversion
program agreement under IC 33-39-1-8 or a deferral program
agreement under IC 34-28-5-1 and for deposit in the state general fund
fifty-five percent (55%) of the amount of fees collected under the
following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(b) The city or town fiscal officer shall distribute monthly to the
county auditor as the county share twenty percent (20%) of the amount
of fees collected under the following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(c) The city or town fiscal officer shall retain twenty-five percent
(25%) as the city or town share of the fees collected under the
following:
(1) IC 33-37-4-1(a) (criminal costs fees).
(2) IC 33-37-4-2(a) (infraction or ordinance violation costs fees).
(3) IC 33-37-4-4(a) (civil costs fees).
(4) IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(A) (small claims costs fees).
(5) IC 33-37-5-17 (deferred prosecution fees).
(d) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute semiannually to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state user fee fund established
in IC 33-37-9 the following:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
(3) One hundred percent (100%) of the highway worksite fees
collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(9) and IC 33-37-4-2(b)(5).
(4) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18.
(5) One hundred percent (100%) of the automated record keeping
fee collected under IC 33-37-5-21 not distributed under
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


subsection (a).
(e) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute monthly to the
county auditor the following:
(1) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the drug abuse, prosecution,
interdiction, and correction fees collected under
IC 33-37-4-1(b)(5).
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) of the alcohol and drug
countermeasures fees collected under IC 33-37-4-1(b)(6),
IC 33-37-4-2(b)(4), and IC 33-37-4-3(b)(5).
The county auditor shall deposit fees distributed by a clerk under this
subsection into the county drug free community fund established under
IC 5-2-11.
(f) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute monthly to the
city or town fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) one hundred
percent (100%) of the following:
(1) The late payment fees collected under IC 33-37-5-22.
(2) The small claims service fee collected under
IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(B) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(2).
(3) The small claims garnishee service fee collected under
IC 33-37-4-6(a)(1)(C) or IC 33-37-4-6(a)(3).
(4) Twenty-five percent (25%) of the safe schools fee collected
under IC 33-37-5-18.
The city or town fiscal officer (as defined in IC 36-1-2-7) shall deposit
fees distributed by a clerk under this subsection in the city or town
general fund.
(g) The clerk of a city or town court shall semiannually distribute to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund one hundred
percent (100%) of the following:
(1) The public defense administration fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-21.2.
(2) The DNA sample processing fees collected under
IC 33-37-5-26.2.
(3) The court administration fees collected under IC 33-37-5-27.
(4) The judicial insurance adjustment fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-25.
(5) The prosecuting attorney compensation fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-37.
(h) The clerk of a city or town court shall semiannually distribute to
the state comptroller for deposit in the state general fund seventy-five
percent (75%) of the judicial salaries fee collected under
IC 33-37-5-26. The city or town fiscal officer shall retain twenty-five
percent (25%) of the judicial salaries fee collected under
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


IC 33-37-5-26. The funds retained by the city or town shall be
prioritized to fund city or town court operations.
(i) The clerk of a city or town court shall distribute semiannually to
the state comptroller for deposit in the pro bono legal services fund
established by IC 33-37-5-34 one hundred percent (100%) of the pro
bono legal services fees collected under IC 33-37-5-31.
SECTION 15. IC 33-39-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.55-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The council shall do the following:
(1) Assist in the coordination of the duties of the prosecuting
attorneys of the state and their staffs.
(2) Prepare manuals of procedure.
(3) Give assistance in preparation of the trial briefs, forms, and
instructions.
(4) Conduct training for prosecuting attorneys and the staff of
prosecuting attorneys.
(5) Conduct research and studies that would be of interest and
value to all prosecuting attorneys and their staffs.
(6) Maintain liaison contact with study commissions and agencies
of all branches of local, state, and federal government that will be
of benefit to law enforcement and the fair administration of
justice in Indiana.
(7) Adopt guidelines and standards for services under which
the counties will be eligible for reimbursement under
IC 33-39-11.
(7) (8) Adopt guidelines for the expenditure of funds derived from
a deferral program or a pretrial diversion program.
(8) (9) The council shall:
(A) compile forfeiture data received under IC 34-24-1-4.5; and
(B) annually submit a report to the legislative council
containing the compiled data.
The council shall submit the report to the legislative council before
July 15 of every year. The report must be in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6. The council may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to implement
this subdivision.
SECTION 16. IC 33-39-8.1-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.147-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) If the board determines that a prosecuting
attorney is a noncompliant prosecuting attorney, the board shall issue
a report to:
(1) the prosecuting attorneys council of Indiana; and
(2) the alleged noncompliant prosecuting attorney.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(b) Upon receipt of a report that a prosecuting attorney is a
noncompliant prosecuting attorney, the board may notify the state
comptroller.
SECTION 17. IC 33-39-11 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 11. Public Prosecution Fund
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "council" means the prosecuting
attorneys council of Indiana established by IC 33-39-8-2.
Sec. 2. The public prosecution fund is established to provide
county reimbursement of compensation paid to deputy prosecuting
attorneys and administrative expenses. The fund shall be
administered by the council.
Sec. 3. The fund consists of money appropriated to the fund by
the general assembly.
Sec. 4. The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund
not currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested.
Sec. 5. Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does
not revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 6. (a) A county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a
certified request to the state comptroller for reimbursement from
the public prosecution fund for salary paid to a deputy prosecuting
attorney, other than a chief deputy prosecuting attorney or an
elected prosecuting attorney, if the annual salary of the deputy
prosecuting attorney is equal to at least fifty-five percent (55%) of
the salary paid to the elected full-time prosecuting attorney. The
county auditor may request reimbursement under this subsection
in an amount that does not exceed twenty-seven and one-half
percent (27.5%) of the salary paid to the elected full-time
prosecuting attorney.
(b) A county auditor may submit on a quarterly basis a certified
request to the state comptroller for reimbursement from the public
prosecution fund for the county's expenditures for fringe benefits
provided to a deputy prosecuting attorney, other than a chief
deputy prosecuting attorney or an elected prosecuting attorney, if
the annual salary of the deputy prosecuting attorney is equal to at
least fifty-five percent (55%) of the salary paid to the elected
full-time prosecuting attorney. However, a request for
reimbursement for fringe benefits under this subsection may not
exceed fifteen thousand one hundred forty dollars ($15,140).
Sec. 7. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), upon receiving
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


certification from a county auditor, the state comptroller shall
issue a warrant to the treasurer of state for disbursement to the
county of the amount certified.
(b) If the state comptroller has received instruction from the
council under IC 33-39-8.1-9 to withhold payment from the county
because the prosecuting attorney is a noncompliant prosecuting
attorney, the state comptroller shall not issue a warrant under
subsection (a).
SECTION 18. IC 35-35-3-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.50-2017,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) No plea agreement may be made by the
prosecuting attorney to a court on a felony charge except:
(1) in writing; and
(2) before the defendant enters a plea of guilty.
The plea agreement shall be shown as filed, and if its contents indicate
that the prosecuting attorney anticipates that the defendant intends to
enter a plea of guilty to a felony charge, the court shall order the
presentence report required by IC 35-38-1-8 and may hear evidence on
the plea agreement.
(b) If the plea agreement is not accepted, the court shall reject it
before the case may be disposed of by trial or by guilty plea. If the court
rejects the plea agreement, subsequent plea agreements may be filed
with the court, subject to the same requirements that this chapter
imposes upon the initial plea agreement.
(c) A plea agreement in a misdemeanor case may be submitted
orally to the court.
(d) In a misdemeanor case, if:
(1) the court rejects a plea agreement; and
(2) the prosecuting attorney or the defendant files a written
motion for change of judge within ten (10) days after the plea
agreement is rejected;
the court shall grant the motion for change of judge and transfer the
proceeding to a special judge under the Indiana Rules of Criminal
Procedure. However, there may not be more than one (1) transfer of the
proceeding to a special judge under this subsection.
(e) (d) If the court accepts a plea agreement, it shall be bound by its
terms.
SECTION 19. IC 35-38-1-21 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21. (a) A court that
receives a petition from the department of correction under
IC 35-38-3-5 may, after notice to the prosecuting attorney of the
judicial circuit in which the defendant's case originated, hold a hearing
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


for the purpose of determining whether the offender named in the
petition may be placed in home detention under IC 35-38-2.5 instead
of commitment to the department of correction for the remainder of the
offender's minimum sentence.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 35-35-3-3(e), IC 35-35-3-3(d), and after a
hearing held under this section, a sentencing court may order the
offender named in the petition filed under IC 35-38-3-5 to be placed in
home detention under IC 35-38-2.5 instead of commitment to the
department of correction for the remainder of the offender's minimum
sentence.
SECTION 20. IC 35-38-1-33, AS ADDED BY P.L.87-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33. (a) As used in this section, "offender" means
an individual convicted of a sex offense.
(b) As used in this section, "sex offense" has the meaning set forth
in IC 11-8-8-5.2.
(c) An offender may petition for waiver of the residency restriction
described in IC 35-46-1-15.1(c). IC 35-46-1-15.1(d). The court may
waive the residency restriction if the court, at a hearing at which the
offender is present and of which the prosecuting attorney has been
notified, determines that:
(1) the offender has successfully completed a sex offender
treatment program; and
(2) good cause exists to allow the offender to reside within one (1)
mile of the residence of the victim of the offender's sex offense.
However, the court may not grant a waiver under this subsection if the
offender is a sexually violent predator under IC 35-38-1-7.5 or if the
offender is an offender against children under IC 35-42-4-11.
(d) If the court grants a waiver under this section, the court shall
determine the duration of the waiver. The offender may petition the
court for an extension of the waiver not later than sixty (60) days before
its expiration. However, if the court denies an offender's petition for
waiver under this section, then the offender is subject to prosecution for
the offense described in IC 35-46-1-15.1(c). IC 35-46-1-15.1(d).
(e) If the court grants a waiver under this section, the court shall
state in writing the reasons for granting the waiver. The court's written
statement of its reasons shall be incorporated into the record.
(f) The address of the victim of the offender's sex offense is
confidential even if the court grants a waiver under this section.
SECTION 21. IC 35-38-2.6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to persons
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


convicted of any of the following offenses: whenever any part of the
sentence may not be suspended under IC 35-50-2-2.2:
(1) Sex crimes under IC 35-42-4 or IC 35-46-1-3.
(2) A Level 1 felony.
(3) A Class A felony.
(4) Any of the following felonies:
(A) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(B) A battery offense included in IC 35-42-2 with a deadly
weapon or causing death.
(C) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(D) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3) with a deadly
weapon.
(E) Robbery (IC 35-42-5-1) resulting in serious bodily injury
or with a deadly weapon.
(F) Arson (IC 35-43-1-1) for hire resulting in serious bodily
injury.
(G) Burglary (IC 35-43-2-1) resulting in serious bodily injury.
(H) Resisting law enforcement (IC 35-44.1-3-1) with a deadly
weapon.
(I) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(J) Disarming a law enforcement officer (IC 35-44.1-3-2).
(K) A sentence for a crime that is enhanced by criminal
organization (IC 35-50-2-15).
(L) An offense that is enhanced by habitual offender
(IC 35-50-2-8) or habitual substance offender
(IC 9-30-15.5-2) determination.
(M) An offense that is enhanced by the use of a firearm
under IC 35-50-2-11.
(N) Escape (IC 35-44.1-3-4).
(O) Unlawful carrying of a handgun (IC 35-47-2-1.5).
(P) An offense in which the defendant used a firearm in the
commission of the offense, regardless of whether the use of
the firearm is an element.
SECTION 22. IC 35-38-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.112-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Appeals to the supreme court or to the court
of appeals, as provided by court rules, may be taken by the state as of
right in the following cases:
(1) From an order granting a motion to dismiss one (1) or more
counts of an indictment or information.
(2) From an order granting a motion to discharge a defendant
before trial for any reason, including delay commencing trial or
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


after the defendant's plea of former jeopardy.
(3) From an order granting a motion to correct errors.
(4) Upon a question reserved by the state, if the defendant is
acquitted.
(5) From an order granting a motion to suppress evidence, if the
ultimate effect of the order is to preclude further prosecution of
one (1) or more counts of an information or indictment.
(6) From a sentencing order.
(b) The state may appeal an interlocutory order to the supreme court
or to the court of appeals, as provided by court rules, if the trial court
certifies the appeal and the court on appeal finds that:
(1) the state will suffer substantial expense, damage, or injury if
the order is erroneous and the determination thereof is withheld
until after judgment;
(2) the order involves a substantial question of law, the early
determination of which will promote a more orderly disposition
of the case; or
(3) the remedy by appeal after judgment is otherwise inadequate.
(c) An interlocutory order that may be appealed by the state under
subsection (b) includes but is not limited to:
(1) any order granting a motion to suppress evidence that is
substantially important to the prosecution and does not have the
ultimate effect of precluding further prosecution; and
(2) any discovery order claimed to violate a court rule, statute, or
case law.
SECTION 23. IC 35-42-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.203-2018,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) As used in this section, "fetus" means a
fetus in any stage of development.
(b) A person who kills another human being while committing or
attempting to commit:
(1) a Level 5 or Level 6 felony that inherently poses a risk of
serious bodily injury;
(2) a Class A misdemeanor that inherently poses a risk of serious
bodily injury; or
(3) battery;
commits involuntary manslaughter, a Level 5 Level 4 felony.
(c) Except as provided in section 6.5 of this chapter, a person who
kills a fetus while committing or attempting to commit:
(1) a Level 5 or Level 6 felony that inherently poses a risk of
serious bodily injury;
(2) a Class A misdemeanor that inherently poses a risk of serious
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


bodily injury;
(3) a battery offense included in IC 35-42-2; or
(4) a violation of IC 9-30-5-1 through IC 9-30-5-5 (operating a
vehicle while intoxicated);
commits involuntary manslaughter, a Level 5 Level 4 felony.
SECTION 24. IC 35-42-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2013,
SECTION 415, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A person who recklessly kills
another human being commits reckless homicide, a Level 5 Level 4
felony.
SECTION 25. IC 35-45-3-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A person who places or leaves refuse on the
property of another person, with the intent to cause:
(1) the owner or occupant of the property;
(2) an invitee of the owner or occupant of the property; or
(3) a family member or person closely associated with a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2);
to reasonably fear for their physical safety, commits malicious
littering, a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 26. IC 35-46-1-4.1, AS ADDED BY P.L.158-2013,
SECTION 551, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. (a) As used in this section,
"child care provider" means a person who provides child care in or on
behalf of:
(1) a child care center (as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.4); or
(2) a child care home (as defined in IC 12-7-2-28.6);
regardless of whether the child care center or child care home is
licensed.
(b) A child care provider who recklessly supervises a child commits
reckless supervision, a Class B misdemeanor. However, the offense is
a Class A misdemeanor if the offense results in serious bodily injury to
a child, and a Level 6 Level 4 felony if the offense results in the death
of a child.
SECTION 27. IC 35-46-1-15.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.28-2023,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.1. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally
violates:
(1) a protective order to prevent domestic or family violence or
harassment issued under IC 34-26-5 (or, if the order involved a
family or household member, under IC 34-26-2 or IC 34-4-5.1-5
before their repeal);
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(2) an ex parte protective order issued under IC 34-26-5 (or, if the
order involved a family or household member, an emergency
order issued under IC 34-26-2 or IC 34-4-5.1 before their repeal);
(3) a workplace violence restraining order issued under
IC 34-26-6;
(4) a no contact order in a dispositional decree issued under
IC 31-34-20-1, IC 31-37-19-1, or IC 31-37-5-6 (or IC 31-6-4-15.4
or IC 31-6-4-15.9 before their repeal) or an order issued under
IC 31-32-13 (or IC 31-6-7-14 before its repeal) that orders the
person to refrain from direct or indirect contact with a child in
need of services or a delinquent child;
(5) a no contact order issued as a condition of pretrial release,
including release on bail or personal recognizance, or pretrial
diversion, and including a no contact order issued under
IC 35-33-8-3.6;
(6) a no contact order issued as a condition of probation;
(7) a protective order to prevent domestic or family violence
issued under IC 31-15-5 (or IC 31-16-5 or IC 31-1-11.5-8.2 before
their repeal);
(8) a protective order to prevent domestic or family violence
issued under IC 31-14-16-1 in a paternity action;
(9) an order issued in another state that is substantially similar to
an order described in subdivisions (1) through (8);
(10) an order that is substantially similar to an order described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) and is issued by an Indian:
(A) tribe;
(B) band;
(C) pueblo;
(D) nation; or
(E) organized group or community, including an Alaska
Native village or regional or village corporation as defined in
or established under the Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act
(43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq.);
that is recognized as eligible for the special programs and services
provided by the United States to Indians because of their special
status as Indians;
(11) an order issued under IC 35-33-8-3.2; or
(12) an order issued under IC 35-38-1-30;
commits invasion of privacy, a Class A misdemeanor except as
otherwise provided in this section.
(b) However, The offense described in subsection (a) is a Level 6
felony if one (1) or more of the following apply:
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(1) The person has a prior unrelated conviction for an offense
under this subsection or IC 35-45-10-5 (stalking).
(2) The person committed the offense while charged with
domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3) as a felony.
(b) (c) It is not a defense to a prosecution under subsection (a) that
the accused person used or operated an unmanned aerial vehicle in
committing the violation.
(c) (d) A sex offender under IC 11-8-8-4.5 who:
(1) establishes a new residence within a one (1) mile radius of the
residence of the victim of the offender's sex offense;
(2) intends to reside (as defined in IC 35-42-4-11(b)) at the
residence; and
(3) at the time the sex offender established the residence, knew or
reasonably should have known that the residence was located
within a one (1) mile radius of the residence of the victim of the
offender's sex offense;
commits invasion of privacy, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the
offense is a Level 6 felony if the sex offender has a prior unrelated
conviction under this subsection.
(d) (e) The victim of the sex offender's sex offense may not be
prosecuted under subsection (c) subsection (d) if the victim's liability
is based on aiding, inducing, or causing the offender to commit the
offense described in subsection (c). subsection (d).
(e) (f) Subsection (c) Subsection (d) does not apply to a sex
offender who has obtained a waiver of residency under IC 35-38-2-2.5
or IC 35-38-1-33.
SECTION 28. IC 35-50-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) As used in this section, "crime of violence"
means the following:
(1) Murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
(2) Attempted murder (IC 35-41-5-1).
(3) Voluntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-3).
(4) Involuntary manslaughter (IC 35-42-1-4).
(5) Reckless homicide (IC 35-42-1-5).
(6) Battery (IC 35-42-2-1) as a:
(A) Level 2 felony;
(B) Level 3 felony;
(C) Level 4 felony; or
(D) Level 5 felony.
(7) Domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3) as a:
(A) Level 2 felony;
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(B) Level 3 felony;
(C) Level 4 felony; or
(D) Level 5 felony.
(8) Aggravated battery (IC 35-42-2-1.5).
(9) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2).
(10) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(11) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its repeal).
(12) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(13) Sexual misconduct with a minor as a Level 1 felony under
IC 35-42-4-9(a)(2) or a Level 2 felony under IC 35-42-4-9(b)(2).
(14) Robbery as a Level 2 felony or a Level 3 felony
(IC 35-42-5-1).
(15) Burglary as a Level 1 felony, Level 2 felony, Level 3 felony,
or Level 4 felony (IC 35-43-2-1).
(16) Operating a vehicle while intoxicated causing death or
catastrophic injury (IC 9-30-5-5).
(17) Operating a vehicle while intoxicated causing serious bodily
injury to another person (IC 9-30-5-4).
(18) Child exploitation as a Level 5 felony under IC 35-42-4-4(b)
or a Level 4 felony under IC 35-42-4-4(c).
(19) Resisting law enforcement as a felony (IC 35-44.1-3-1).
(20) Unlawful possession of a firearm by a serious violent felon
(IC 35-47-4-5).
(21) Strangulation (IC 35-42-2-9) as a Level 5 felony.
(b) As used in this section, "episode of criminal conduct" means
offenses or a connected series of offenses that are closely related in
time, place, and circumstance.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (e) or (f) the court shall
determine whether terms of imprisonment shall be served concurrently
or consecutively. The court may consider the:
(1) aggravating circumstances in IC 35-38-1-7.1(a); and
(2) mitigating circumstances in IC 35-38-1-7.1(b);
in making a determination under this subsection. The court may order
terms of imprisonment to be served consecutively even if the sentences
are not imposed at the same time. However, except for crimes of
violence, and crimes committed against separate victims in the
same episode of criminal conduct, the total of the consecutive terms
of imprisonment, exclusive of terms of imprisonment under
IC 35-50-2-8 and IC 35-50-2-10 (before its repeal) to which the
defendant is sentenced for felony or misdemeanor convictions arising
out of an episode of criminal conduct shall not exceed the period
described in subsection (d).
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(d) Except as provided in subsection (c), the total of the consecutive
terms of imprisonment to which the defendant is sentenced for
convictions arising out of an episode of criminal conduct may not
exceed the following:
(1) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Class C misdemeanor, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed one (1) year.
(2) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Class B misdemeanor, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed two (2) years.
(3) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Class A misdemeanor, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed three (3) years.
(4) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 6 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed four (4) years.
(5) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 5 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed seven (7) years.
(6) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 4 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed fifteen (15) years.
(7) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 3 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed twenty (20) years.
(8) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 2 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed thirty-two (32) years.
(9) If the most serious crime for which the defendant is sentenced
is a Level 1 felony, the total of the consecutive terms of
imprisonment may not exceed forty-two (42) years.
(e) If, after being arrested for one (1) crime, a person commits
another crime:
(1) before the date the person is discharged from probation,
parole, or a term of imprisonment imposed for the first crime; or
(2) while the person is released:
(A) upon the person's own recognizance; or
(B) on bond;
the terms of imprisonment for the crimes shall be served consecutively,
regardless of the order in which the crimes are tried and sentences are
imposed.
(f) If the factfinder determines under IC 35-50-2-11 that a person
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


used a firearm in the commission of the offense for which the person
was convicted, the term of imprisonment for the underlying offense and
the additional term of imprisonment imposed under IC 35-50-2-11
must be served consecutively.
SECTION 29. IC 35-50-2-2.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.170-2023,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.2. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) or
(c), the court may suspend any part of a sentence for a felony.
(b) If a person is convicted of:
(1) a Level 2 felony; or
(2) a Level 3 felony and has:
(A) any prior unrelated felony conviction, other than a
conviction for a felony involving marijuana, hashish, hash oil,
or salvia divinorum; or
(B) a prior juvenile adjudication for an act that would
constitute a felony if committed by an adult, other than an
adjudication for an offense involving marijuana, hashish, hash
oil, or salvia divinorum, and less than three (3) years have
elapsed between commission of the act and the commission of
the Level 3 felony for which the person is being sentenced;
the court may suspend only that part of a sentence that is in excess of
the minimum sentence for the Level 2 felony or the Level 3 felony.
(b) A court may suspend only that part of a felony that is in
excess of the minimum sentence for the felony if:
(1) the person has a prior unrelated:
(A) conviction for a felony; or
(B) juvenile adjudication for a delinquent act that is a
felony offense, if less than three (3) years have elapsed
between commission of the delinquent act and the
commission of the felony for which the person is being
sentenced;
(2) the felony is a Level 2 felony; or
(3) the felony is a crime of violence (as defined by
IC 35-50-1-2).
(c) The court may suspend only that part of a sentence for murder
or a Level 1 felony conviction that is in excess of the minimum
sentence for murder or the Level 1 felony conviction.
(d) The court may suspend any part of a sentence for an offense
filed in adult court under IC 31-30-1-4(d), unless the offense is murder
(IC 35-42-1-1).
SECTION 30. IC 35-50-6-3.3, AS AMENDED BY THE
TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF THE 2026 GENERAL
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.3. (a) In addition to any educational credit a
person earns under subsection (b), or good time credit a person earns
under section 3 or 3.1 of this chapter, a person earns educational credit
if the person:
(1) is in credit Class I, Class A, or Class B;
(2) has demonstrated a pattern consistent with rehabilitation; and
(3) successfully completes requirements to obtain one (1) of the
following:
(A) A general educational development (GED) diploma under
IC 20-20-6 (before its repeal) or IC 22-4.1-18, if the person
has not previously obtained a high school diploma.
(B) Except as provided in subsection (o), a high school
diploma, if the person has not previously obtained a general
educational development (GED) diploma.
(C) An associate degree from an approved postsecondary
educational institution (as defined under IC 21-7-13-6(a))
earned during the person's incarceration.
(D) A bachelor bachelor's degree from an approved
postsecondary educational institution (as defined under
IC 21-7-13-6(a)) earned during the person's incarceration.
(b) In addition to any educational credit that a person earns under
subsection (a), or good time credit a person earns under section 3 or 3.1
of this chapter, a person may earn educational credit if, while confined
by the department of correction, the person:
(1) is in credit Class I, Class A, or Class B;
(2) demonstrates a pattern consistent with rehabilitation; and
(3) successfully completes requirements for at least one (1) of the
following:
(A) To obtain a certificate of completion of a career and
technical or vocational education program approved by the
department of correction.
(B) To obtain a certificate of completion of a substance abuse
program approved by the department of correction.
(C) To obtain a certificate of completion of a literacy and basic
life skills program approved by the department of correction.
(D) To obtain a certificate of completion of a reformative
program approved by the department of correction.
(E) An individualized case management plan approved by the
department of correction.
(c) The department of correction shall establish admissions criteria
and other requirements for programs available for earning educational
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


credit under subsection (b). A person may not earn educational credit
under this section for the same program of study. The department of
correction, in consultation with the department of workforce
development, shall approve a program only if the program is likely to
lead to an employable occupation.
(d) The amount of educational credit a person may earn under this
section is the following:
(1) Six (6) months for completion of a state of Indiana general
educational development (GED) diploma under IC 20-20-6
(before its repeal) or IC 22-4.1-18.
(2) One (1) year for graduation from high school.
(3) Not more than one (1) year for completion of an associate
degree.
(4) Not more than two (2) years for completion of a bachelor
bachelor's degree.
(5) Not more than a total of one (1) year, as determined by the
department of correction, for the completion of one (1) or more
career and technical or vocational education programs approved
by the department of correction.
(6) Not more than a total of six (6) months, as determined by the
department of correction, for the completion of one (1) or more
substance abuse programs approved by the department of
correction.
(7) Not more than a total of six (6) months, as determined by the
department of correction, for the completion of one (1) or more
literacy and basic life skills programs approved by the department
of correction.
(8) Not more than a total of six (6) months, as determined by the
department of correction, for completion of one (1) or more
reformative programs approved by the department of correction.
However, a person who is serving a sentence for an offense listed
under IC 11-8-8-4.5 may not earn educational credit under this
subdivision.
(9) An amount Not more than a total of six (6) months, as
determined by the department of correction, for the completion
of one (1) or more programs offered under a policy adopted by
the department of correction concerning the individualized case
management plan, not to exceed the maximum amount described
in subsection (j). subsection (j)(2).
However, a person who does not have a substance abuse problem that
qualifies the person to earn educational credit in a substance abuse
program may earn not more than a total of twelve (12) months of
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


educational credit, as determined by the department of correction, for
the completion of one (1) or more career and technical or vocational
education programs approved by the department of correction. If a
person earns more than six (6) months of educational credit for the
completion of one (1) or more career and technical or vocational
education programs, the person is ineligible to earn educational credit
for the completion of one (1) or more substance abuse programs.
(e) Educational credit earned under this section must be directly
proportional to the time served and course work completed while
incarcerated. The department of correction shall adopt rules under
IC 4-22-2 necessary to implement this subsection.
(f) Educational credit earned by a person under this section is
subtracted from the release date that would otherwise apply to the
person by the sentencing court after subtracting all other credit time
earned by the person.
(g) A person does not earn educational credit under subsection (a)
unless the person completes at least a portion of the degree
requirements after June 30, 1993.
(h) A person does not earn educational credit under subsection (b)
unless the person completes at least a portion of the program
requirements after June 30, 1999.
(i) Educational credit earned by a person under subsection (a) for a
diploma or degree completed before July 1, 1999, shall be subtracted
from:
(1) the release date that would otherwise apply to the person after
subtracting all other credit time earned by the person, if the
person has not been convicted of an offense described in
subdivision (2); or
(2) the period of imprisonment imposed on the person by the
sentencing court, if the person has been convicted of one (1) of
the following crimes:
(A) Rape (IC 35-42-4-1).
(B) Criminal deviate conduct (IC 35-42-4-2) (before its
repeal).
(C) Child molesting (IC 35-42-4-3).
(D) Child exploitation (IC 35-42-4-4(b) or IC 35-42-4-4(c)).
(E) Vicarious sexual gratification (IC 35-42-4-5).
(F) Child solicitation (IC 35-42-4-6).
(G) Child seduction (IC 35-42-4-7).
(H) Sexual misconduct with a minor (IC 35-42-4-9) as a:
(i) Class A felony, Class B felony, or Class C felony for a
crime committed before July 1, 2014; or
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


(ii) Level 1, Level 2, or Level 4 felony, for a crime
committed after June 30, 2014.
(I) Incest (IC 35-46-1-3).
(J) Sexual battery (IC 35-42-4-8).
(K) Kidnapping (IC 35-42-3-2), if the victim is less than
eighteen (18) years of age.
(L) Criminal confinement (IC 35-42-3-3), if the victim is less
than eighteen (18) years of age.
(j) The maximum amount of educational credit a person may earn
under this section is the lesser of:
(1) two (2) years; or
(2) one-third (1/3) of the person's total applicable credit time.
(k) Educational credit earned under this section by an offender
serving a sentence for stalking (IC 35-45-10-5), a felony against a
person under IC 35-42, or for a crime listed in IC 11-8-8-5, shall be
reduced to the extent that application of the educational credit would
otherwise result in:
(1) postconviction release (as defined in IC 35-40-4-6); or
(2) assignment of the person to a community transition program;
in less than forty-five (45) days after the person earns the educational
credit.
(l) A person may earn educational credit for multiple degrees at the
same education level under subsection (d) only in accordance with
guidelines approved by the department of correction. The department
of correction may approve guidelines for proper sequence of education
degrees under subsection (d).
(m) A person may not earn educational credit:
(1) for a general educational development (GED) diploma if the
person has previously earned a high school diploma; or
(2) for a high school diploma if the person has previously earned
a general educational development (GED) diploma.
(n) A person may not earn educational credit under this section if
the person:
(1) commits an offense listed in IC 11-8-8-4.5 while the person is
required to register as a sex or violent offender under IC 11-8-8-7;
and
(2) is committed to the department of correction after being
convicted of the offense listed in IC 11-8-8-4.5.
(o) For a person to earn educational credit under subsection
(a)(3)(B) for successfully completing the requirements for a high
school diploma through correspondence courses, each correspondence
course must be approved by the department before the person begins
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


the correspondence course. The department may approve a
correspondence course only if the entity administering the course is
recognized and accredited by the department of education in the state
where the entity is located.
(p) The department of correction shall, before May 1, 2023, submit
a report to the legislative council, in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6, concerning the implementation of the individualized case
management plan. The report must include the following:
(1) The ratio of case management staff to offenders participating
in the individualized case management plan as of January 1, 2023.
(2) The average number of days awarded to offenders
participating in the individualized case management plan from
January 1, 2022, through December 31, 2022.
(3) The percentage of the prison population currently participating
in an individualized case management plan as of January 1, 2023.
(4) Any other data points or information related to the status of
the implementation of the individualized case management plan.
This subsection expires June 30, 2023.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. President: The Senate Committee on Corrections and Criminal
Law, to which was referred Senate Bill No. 252, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
Senate with the recommendation that said bill be AMENDED as
follows:
Page 23, between lines 10 and 11, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"SECTION 25. IC 35-45-3-4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A person who places or leaves refuse on the
property of another person, with the intent to cause:
(1) the owner or occupant of the property;
(2) an invitee of the owner or occupant of the property; or
(3) a family member or person closely associated with a
person described in subdivision (1) or (2);
to reasonably fear for their physical safety, commits malicious
littering, a Class A misdemeanor.".
Renumber all SECTIONS consecutively.
and when so amended that said bill do pass and be reassigned to the
Senate Committee on Appropriations.
(Reference is to SB 252 as introduced.)
FREEMAN, Chairperson
Committee Vote: Yeas 7, Nays 2.
SB 252—LS 7112/DI 106